Maryland, session 2025, HB1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–904.
(g) (1) Except as provided in [paragraph (2) or (3)] PARAGRAPH (2), (3), OR
(4) of this subsection, an action under this subtitle shall be filed within three years after
the death of the injured person.
(2) (i) In this paragraph, “occupational disease” means a disease caused
by exposure to any toxic substance in the person’s workplace and contracted by a person in
the course of the person’s employment.
(ii) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ACTION UNDER
THIS SECTION ARISING FROM EXPOSURE TO PFAS CHEMICALS, AS DEFINED IN §
6–1601 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(III) If an occupational disease was a cause of a person’s death, an
action UNDER THIS SECTION shall be filed WITHIN THE EARLIER OF:
1. [Within] 10 years of the [time] DATE of death; or
2. [Within] 3 years of the date when the cause of death was
discovered[, whichever is the shorter].
(3) IF EXPOSURE TO PFAS CHEMICALS WAS A CAUSE OF A PERSON’S
DEATH, AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE FILED WITHIN THE EARLIER OF:
(I) 10 YEARS OF THE DATE OF DEATH; OR
(II) 3 YEARS OF THE DATE WHEN THE CAUSE OF DEATH WAS
DISCOVERED.
[(3)] (4) (i) This paragraph applies only to a wrongful death cause of
action arising from conduct that would constitute a criminal homicide under State or
federal law.

HOUSE BILL 1112 3
(ii) If knowledge of a cause of action or the identity of a person whose
wrongful act contributed to a homicide is kept from a party by the conduct of an adverse
party or an accessory or accomplice of an adverse party:
1. The cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time
the party discovered or should have discovered by the exercise of ordinary diligence the
homicide and the identity of the person who contributed to the homicide;
2. A presumption shall exist that the party should have
discovered by the exercise of ordinary diligence the identity of the person who contributed
to the homicide after:
A. A charging document is filed against the person alleged to
have participated in the homicide; and
B. The charging document is unsealed and available to the
public; and
3. An action under this subtitle shall be filed within 3 years
after the date that the cause of action accrues.
5–113.
(b) (1) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ACTION FOR PERSONAL
INJURY ARISING FROM EXPOSURE TO PFAS CHEMICALS, AS DEFINED IN § 6–1601
OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(2) An action for damages arising out of an occupational disease shall be
filed within 3 years of the discovery of facts from which it was known or reasonably should
have been known that an occupational disease was the proximate cause of death, but in
any event not later than 10 years from the date of death.
5–113.1.
IF EXPOSURE TO PFAS CHEMICALS, AS DEFINED IN § 6–1601 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, WAS A CAUSE OF INJURY TO A PERSON, INCLUDING ANY
COMPLICATIONS TO PREGNANCY AND POTENTIAL DAMAGE TO OFFSPRING AS A
RESULT OF THE EXPOSURE, AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES SHALL BE FILED WITHIN THE
EARLIER OF:
(1) 10 YEARS OF THE DATE OF EXPOSURE; OR
(2) 3 YEARS OF THE DATE WHEN THE CAUSE OF INJURY WAS
DISCOVERED.

HOUSE BILL 1112
Article – Environment
6–1601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “PFAS chemicals” means, when used in fire–fighting agents, fire–fighting
equipment, food packaging, [and] rugs and carpets, AND CONSUMER PRODUCTS, a class
of fluorinated organic chemicals that contain at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom,
including perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.
6–1604.2.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO CONSUMER PRODUCTS NOT OTHERWISE
REGULATED UNDER:
(1) THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 19 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(3) § 21–259.2 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, A PERSON MAY NOT MANUFACTURE, SELL,
OFFER FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTE IN THE STATE A CONSUMER PRODUCT THAT
CONTAINS PFAS CHEMICALS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.